Hawaii statutes.
§463-7 Guard and guard agencies; license
required. (a) No individual shall engage in the business of guard for the
purpose of protecting persons or property or to prevent theft or unlawful
taking of goods, wares, merchandise, money, bonds, documents, or other articles
of value for hire or reward or represent oneself to be, or hold oneself out as
such without first obtaining a license as guard from the board and paying the
application and license fees.

(b) No firm shall engage in the business of
guard for the purpose of protecting persons or property or to prevent theft or
unlawful taking of goods, wares, merchandise, money, bonds, documents, or other
articles of value for hire or reward or represent itself to be, hold itself out
as, list itself as, or advertise as a guard agency without first obtaining a
license as a guard agency from the board and paying the application and license
fees. A guard agency shall have in its employ at least one principal guard who
shall be fully responsible for the direct management and control of the guard
agency and the agency's employees when guard services are being provided. [L
1961, c 77, pt of §1; Supp, §165A-7; HRS §463-7; am L 1983, c 40, §4; am L
1984, c 7, §69; am L 1994, c 122, §4; am L 2004, c 94, §6; am L 2006, c 13, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next